Arkansas, session 2025, SB53.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - CONTINUING EDUCATION - COUNTY CLERKS. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Auditor of State, to be payable from the
County and Circuit Clerks Continuing Education Fund, for the County Clerks'
Continuing Education Board in carrying out the responsibilities for
maintaining and operating a continuing education program and certification
program for county clerks by the County Clerks' Continuing Education Board
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXPENSES FOR COUNTY CLERKS CONTINUING
EDUCATION AND CERTIFICATION PROGRAM $75,000
*JAR031*
01/13/2025 8:34:58 AM JAR031

SB53

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - CONTINUING EDUCATION - CIRCUIT CLERKS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Auditor of State, to be payable from the
County and Circuit Clerks Continuing Education Fund, for the Circuit Clerks'
Continuing Education Board in carrying out the responsibilities for
maintaining and operating a continuing education program and certification
program for circuit clerks by the Circuit Clerks' Continuing Education Board
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXPENSES FOR CIRCUIT CLERKS
CONTINUING EDUCATION AND
CERTIFICATION PROGRAM $75,000

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - CONTINUING EDUCATION - COUNTY TREASURERS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Auditor of State, to be payable from the
County Treasurer's Continuing Education Fund, for the County Treasurer's
Continuing Education Board in carrying out the responsibilities for
maintaining and operating a continuing education program for county
treasurers by the County Treasurer's Continuing Education Board for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINTENANCE AND OPERATION OF
CONTINUING EDUCATION PROGRAM $75,000

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CONTINUING EDUCATION - COUNTY COLLECTORS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Auditor of State, to be payable from the
County Collector's Continuing Education Trust Fund, for the County
Collector's Continuing Education Board in carrying out the responsibilities
for maintaining and operating a continuing education program and
certification program for county collectors by the County Collector's
Continuing Education Board for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:
01/13/2025 8:34:58 AM JAR031

SB53

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINTENANCE & OPERATION OF CONTINUING
EDUCATION & CERTIFICATION PROGRAM $75,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - CONTINUING EDUCATION - COUNTY CORONERS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Auditor of State, to be payable from the
County Coroners Continuing Education Fund, for carrying out the
responsibilities and maintaining and operating a continuing education program
and certification program for county coroners by the Arkansas Commission on
Law Enforcement Standards and Training for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) EXPENSES FOR COUNTY CORONERS
CONTINUING EDUCATION AND
CERTIFICATION PROGRAM $125,000

SECTION 6. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
01/13/2025 8:34:58 AM JAR031

SB53
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 8. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.






















01/13/2025 8:34:58 AM JAR031